Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF685.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [3.057] BILLS LAID OVER FOR INCLUSION IN OMNIBUS. new text end new text begin (a) A bill must not be laid over for possible inclusion in a major finance or policy omnibus bill by a standing committee chair unless approved by vote of at least two-thirds of the committee's membership. If sufficient committee membership does not approve that a bill be laid over for possible inclusion in a major finance or policy omnibus bill: (1) the committee may vote to refer the bill to another committee, refer the bill to the full body, or table the bill; or (2) the chair may direct that no further action be taken on the bill. A bill that is tabled or receives no further action due to a failed vote under this section must not be included in a subsequent delete-everything amendment or omnibus bill heard by the committee, unless an amendment to do so is adopted by committee vote and the amendment includes only the policy items specific to the bill. new text end new text begin (b) The house of representatives and the senate must adopt procedural rules as necessary to implement this section. new text end